lexc/adj/enhuadjmnspec.lexc
! enhuadj1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Adj @U.ART.PRESENT@ 

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter +Mid

+Ik
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §oeoezmid§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoebb§ 
§oeoez11§ 
§OEOE4a§ 
§oeoez1e§ §oeoez11e§
! §oeoez1§

LEXICON Root
   Prefleg ;

LEXICON Prefleg
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj ; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Adj
messze AddAdj;

! al only with these
LEXICON AddAdj
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
!@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocase;


Lexicon Tocase1
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possm;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurm;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famm;

  
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Possm
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famm;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famm;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famm;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famm;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famm;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famm;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famm;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famm;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famm;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famm;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famm;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famm;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famm;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famm;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famm;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famm;
LEXICON Plurm
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genm;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genm;
                            Genm1;

LEXICON Famm
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genm;
                       Genm1;

!Use Case of Tocase/Tocase1

LEXICON Genm
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
  
LEXICON Genm1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case1;

LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
							Ik;

Lexicon Ik
+Ik:^ik     Possik;
+Ik:^ik     Plurik;
+Ik:^ik     Famik;
            #;

LEXICON Possik
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famik;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famik;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famik;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famik;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famik;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE1§   Famik;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famik;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famik;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famik;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famik;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE1§k   Famik;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE§im   Famik;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famik;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE§id   Famik;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famik;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE§i   Famik;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famik;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE§ink   Famik;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famik;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famik;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famik;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE§ik   Famik;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famik;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famik;
LEXICON Plurik
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1e§k    Genik;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Genik;
                            Genik;

LEXICON Famik
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genik;
                       Genik;

LEXICON Genik
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseik;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseik;
                       Caseik;
  
LEXICON Caseik
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezmid§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig



!result
!legeslegkedvesebbet
!legeslegkedvesebben
!legkedvesebbet
!legkedvesebben
!kedvesebbet
!kedvesebben
!kedveset
!kedvesen
